tr_TR.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY İiIıŞşÇçĞğÜüÖö-qwertyuopasdfghjklzxcvbnmQWERTYUOPASDFGHJKLZXCVBNM'
FLAG num

SFX N Y 7
SFX N k ğı [^aeıioöuü] k
SFX N k ğın [^aeıioöuü] k
SFX N k ğında [^aeıioöuü] k
SFX N 0 lar [^aeıioöuü]$
SFX N 0 ları [^aeıioöuü]$
SFX N 0 larda [^aeıioöuü]$
SFX N 0 dan [^aeıioöuü]$

# Replace rules to correct specific words or phrases
REP 1
REP birleşik_arap_emirlikleri Birleşik_Arap_Emirlikleri
